Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HCR2027.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Delayed repeal Section 15-1802, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed from and after June 30, 2027. Sec. 2. Title 15, chapter 14, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section 15-1802, to read: START_STATUTE15-1802. In-state student status; requirements A. Beginning on July 1, 2027, an individual is entitled to classification as an in-state student for tuition purposes at any university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents or at any community college as defined in section 15-1401 only if the individual meets all of the following: 1. Completed at least two years of instruction in any of grades one through twelve while present in this state and either: (a) Attended a public school or a private school or homeschool as defined in section 15-802. (b) Participated in an Arizona empowerment scholarship account pursuant to section 15-2402. 2. Either: (a) Graduated from a high school in this state. (b) Was awarded an Arizona high school equivalency diploma pursuant to section 15-702. 3. Either: (a) Is a citizen or legal resident of the United States. (b) Has lawful immigration status under federal law. B. A community college as defined in section 15-1401 may not classify a student as a resident for tuition purposes if the student is not entitled to classification as an in-state student pursuant to subsection A of this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Delayed repeal Section 15-1803, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed from and after June 30, 2027. Sec. 4. Severability If a provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable. Sec. 5. Short title This act may be cited as "The Arizona Tuition Fairness and Legal Status Act". 2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona.